North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 5. Uniform Trusts Act.

§§ 36A-60 through 36A-62.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

§ 36A-63.
[Transferred]

Recodified as § 53-163.1 by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

§§ 36A-64 through 36A-66.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

§ 36A-66.1.
[Transferred]

Recodified as § 53-163.2 by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

§§ 36A-66.2 through 36A-84.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.